Illinois, session 104th, SB4019.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Sections 5 and 20 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.9    "Credit" means one, 5, 10, or 25 cents either won or 10purchased by a player or 5, 10, or 25 cents cash award won by a 11player.12    "Distributor" means an individual, partnership, 13corporation, or limited liability company licensed under this 14Act to buy, sell, lease, or distribute video gaming terminals 15or major components or parts of video gaming terminals to or 16from terminal operators.17    "Electronic card" means a card purchased from a licensed 18establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, licensed 19veterans establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, or 20licensed large truck stop establishment for use in that 21establishment as a substitute for cash in the conduct of 22gaming on a video gaming terminal. 23    "Electronic voucher" means a voucher printed by an   SB4019- 2 -LRB104 20509 LNS 33982 b1electronic video game machine that is redeemable in the 2licensed establishment for which it was issued. 3    "In-location bonus jackpot" means one or more video gaming 4terminals at a single licensed establishment that allows for 5wagers placed on such video gaming terminals to contribute to 6a cumulative maximum jackpot of up to $10,000. 7    "Terminal operator" means an individual, partnership, 8corporation, or limited liability company that is licensed 9under this Act and that owns, services, and maintains video 10gaming terminals for placement in licensed establishments, 11licensed truck stop establishments, licensed large truck stop 12establishments, licensed fraternal establishments, or licensed 13veterans establishments.14    "Licensed technician" means an individual who is licensed 15under this Act to repair, service, and maintain video gaming 16terminals.17    "Licensed terminal handler" means a person, including but 18not limited to an employee or independent contractor working 19for a manufacturer, distributor, supplier, technician, or 20terminal operator, who is licensed under this Act to possess 21or control a video gaming terminal or to have access to the 22inner workings of a video gaming terminal. A licensed terminal 23handler does not include an individual, partnership, 24corporation, or limited liability company defined as a 25manufacturer, distributor, supplier, technician, or terminal 26operator under this Act.   SB4019- 3 -LRB104 20509 LNS 33982 b1    "Manufacturer" means an individual, partnership, 2corporation, or limited liability company that is licensed 3under this Act and that manufactures or assembles video gaming 4terminals.5    "Supplier" means an individual, partnership, corporation, 6or limited liability company that is licensed under this Act 7to supply major components or parts to video gaming terminals 8to licensed terminal operators.9    "Net terminal income" means money put into a video gaming 10terminal minus credits paid out to players.11    "Video gaming terminal" means any electronic video game 12machine that, upon insertion of cash, electronic cards or 13vouchers, or any combination thereof, is available to play or 14simulate the play of a video game, including but not limited to 15video poker, line up, and blackjack, as authorized by the 16Board utilizing a video display and microprocessors in which 17the player may receive free games or credits that can be 18redeemed for cash. The term does not include a machine that 19directly dispenses coins, cash, or tokens or is for amusement 20purposes only.21    "Licensed establishment" means any licensed retail 22establishment where alcoholic liquor is drawn, poured, mixed, 23or otherwise served for consumption on the premises, whether 24the establishment operates on a nonprofit or for-profit basis. 25"Licensed establishment" includes any such establishment that 26has a contractual relationship with an inter-track wagering   SB4019- 4 -LRB104 20509 LNS 33982 b1location licensee licensed under the Illinois Horse Racing Act 2of 1975, provided any contractual relationship shall not 3include any transfer or offer of revenue from the operation of 4video gaming under this Act to any licensee licensed under the 5Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975. Provided, however, that the 6licensed establishment that has such a contractual 7relationship with an inter-track wagering location licensee 8may not, itself, be (i) an inter-track wagering location 9licensee, (ii) the corporate parent or subsidiary of any 10licensee licensed under the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975, 11or (iii) the corporate subsidiary of a corporation that is 12also the corporate parent or subsidiary of any licensee 13licensed under the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975. 14"Licensed establishment" does not include a facility operated 15by an organization licensee, an inter-track wagering licensee, 16or an inter-track wagering location licensee licensed under 17the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 or a riverboat licensed 18under the Illinois Gambling Act, except as provided in this 19paragraph. The changes made to this definition by Public Act 2098-587 are declarative of existing law.21    "Licensed fraternal establishment" means the location 22where a qualified fraternal organization that derives its 23charter from a national fraternal organization regularly 24meets.25    "Licensed veterans establishment" means the location where 26a qualified veterans organization that derives its charter   SB4019- 5 -LRB104 20509 LNS 33982 b1from a national veterans organization regularly meets.2    "Licensed truck stop establishment" means a facility (i) 3that is at least a 3-acre facility with a convenience store, 4(ii) with separate diesel islands for fueling commercial motor 5vehicles, (iii) that sells at retail more than 10,000 gallons 6of diesel or biodiesel fuel per month, and (iv) with parking 7spaces for commercial motor vehicles. "Commercial motor 8vehicles" has the same meaning as defined in Section 18b-101 9of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The requirement of item (iii) of 10this paragraph may be met by showing that estimated future 11sales or past sales average at least 10,000 gallons per month. 12    "Licensed large truck stop establishment" means a facility 13located within 3 road miles from a freeway interchange, as 14measured in accordance with the Department of Transportation's 15rules regarding the criteria for the installation of business 16signs: (i) that is at least a 3-acre facility with a 17convenience store, (ii) with separate diesel islands for 18fueling commercial motor vehicles, (iii) that sells at retail 19more than 50,000 gallons of diesel or biodiesel fuel per 20month, and (iv) with parking spaces for commercial motor 21vehicles. "Commercial motor vehicles" has the same meaning as 22defined in Section 18b-101 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 23requirement of item (iii) of this paragraph may be met by 24showing that estimated future sales or past sales average at 25least 50,000 gallons per month. 26    "Sales agent and broker" means an individual, partnership,   SB4019- 6 -LRB104 20509 LNS 33982 b1corporation, limited liability company, or other business 2entity engaged in the solicitation or receipt of business from 3current or potential licensed establishments, licensed 4fraternal establishments, licensed veterans establishments, 5licensed truck stop establishments, or licensed large truck 6stop establishments either on an employment or contractual 7basis. 8(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 9    (230 ILCS 40/20)10    Sec. 20. Video gaming terminal payouts. 11    (a) A video gaming terminal may not directly dispense 12coins, cash, tokens, or any other article of exchange or value 13except for receipt tickets. Tickets shall be dispensed by 14pressing the ticket dispensing button on the video gaming 15terminal at the end of one's turn or play. The ticket shall 16indicate the total amount of credits and the cash award, the 17time of day in a 24-hour format showing hours and minutes, the 18date, the terminal serial number, the sequential number of the 19ticket, and an encrypted validation number from which the 20validity of the prize may be determined. Each licensed 21establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 22large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 23establishment, and licensed veterans establishment at which 24video gaming terminals are available shall have a payout 25device approved by the Board The player shall turn in this   SB4019- 7 -LRB104 20509 LNS 33982 b1ticket to the appropriate person at the licensed 2establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 3large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 4establishment, or licensed veterans establishment to receive 5the cash award. 6    (b) The cost of the credit shall be one cent, 5 cents, 10 7cents, 25 cents, or $1, and the maximum wager played per hand 8shall not exceed $4. No cash award for the maximum wager on any 9individual hand shall exceed the W-2G reporting requirements 10set by the Internal Revenue Service. Cash awards shall be 11awarded in denominations rounded to the nearest 5 cent credit, 12with rounding conducted upward or downward as applicable 13$1,199. No cash award for the maximum wager on a jackpot, 14progressive or otherwise, shall exceed $10,000.15    (c) In-location bonus jackpot games are hereby authorized. 16The Board shall adopt emergency rules pursuant to Section 5-45 17of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act to implement this 18subsection (c) within 90 days after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. Jackpot winnings 20from in-location progressive games shall be paid by the 21terminal operator to the player not later than 3 days after 22winning such a jackpot. 23(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.)